District of Columbia statutes.
3-1251.04

Committee staff.

The Committee may employee staff or engage the services of a consultant to carry out its functions in accordance with the approved budget of the District of Columbia and as approved by the Board.

History

May 1, 2001, D.C. Law 13-297, § 5, 48 DCR 2036